eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 184 Y 184
SFX 184    0       na      .
SFX 184    0       naka      .
SFX 184    0       nako/243      .
SFX 184    0       tzat      .
SFX 184    0       k      .
SFX 184    0       ko/243      .
SFX 184    0       koa      .
SFX 184    0       koago/243      .
SFX 184    0       koak      .
SFX 184    0       koarekin      .
SFX 184    0       koarendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       koarentzat      .
SFX 184    0       koari      .
SFX 184    0       koaz      .
SFX 184    0       koegi      .
SFX 184    0       koei      .
SFX 184    0       koek      .
SFX 184    0       koekin      .
SFX 184    0       koendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       koentzat      .
SFX 184    0       koetaraino      .
SFX 184    0       koetarantz      .
SFX 184    0       koetarat      .
SFX 184    0       koetara      .
SFX 184    0       koetatik      .
SFX 184    0       koetan      .
SFX 184    0       koetarik      .
SFX 184    0       koez      .
SFX 184    0       kogatik      .
SFX 184    0       kooi      .
SFX 184    0       kook      .
SFX 184    0       kookin      .
SFX 184    0       koontzat      .
SFX 184    0       kootaz      .
SFX 184    0       kooz      .
SFX 184    0       kotzat      .
SFX 184    0       kok      .
SFX 184    0       kotaraino      .
SFX 184    0       kotarantz      .
SFX 184    0       kotarat      .
SFX 184    0       kotara      .
SFX 184    0       kotatik      .
SFX 184    0       kotan      .
SFX 184    0       kotarik      .
SFX 184    0       koz      .
SFX 184    0       korekin      .
SFX 184    0       korendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       korentzat      .
SFX 184    0       kori      .
SFX 184    0       korik      .
SFX 184    0       koan      .
SFX 184    0       koraino      .
SFX 184    0       korantz      .
SFX 184    0       korat      .
SFX 184    0       kora      .
SFX 184    0       kotik      .
SFX 184    0       raino      .
SFX 184    0       rainoko/243      .
SFX 184    0       rantz      .
SFX 184    0       rantzago/243      .
SFX 184    0       rantzegi      .
SFX 184    0       ranzko/243      .
SFX 184    0       rat      .
SFX 184    0       rako/243      .
SFX 184    0       ra      .
SFX 184    0       rago/243      .
SFX 184    0       tik      .
SFX 184    0       tiko/243      .
SFX 184    0       tako/243      .
SFX 184    0       takoa      .
SFX 184    0       takoago/243      .
SFX 184    0       takoak      .
SFX 184    0       takoarekin      .
SFX 184    0       takoarendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       takoarentzat      .
SFX 184    0       takoari      .
SFX 184    0       takoaz      .
SFX 184    0       takoegi      .
SFX 184    0       takoei      .
SFX 184    0       takoek      .
SFX 184    0       takoekin      .
SFX 184    0       takoendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       takoentzat      .
SFX 184    0       takoetaraino      .
SFX 184    0       takoetarantz      .
SFX 184    0       takoetarat      .
SFX 184    0       takoetara      .
SFX 184    0       takoetatik      .
SFX 184    0       takoetan      .
SFX 184    0       takoetarik      .
SFX 184    0       takoez      .
SFX 184    0       takogatik      .
SFX 184    0       takooi      .
SFX 184    0       takook      .
SFX 184    0       takookin      .
SFX 184    0       takoontzat      .
SFX 184    0       takootaz      .
SFX 184    0       takooz      .
SFX 184    0       takotzat      .
SFX 184    0       takok      .
SFX 184    0       takotaraino      .
SFX 184    0       takotarantz      .
SFX 184    0       takotarat      .
SFX 184    0       takotara      .
SFX 184    0       takotatik      .
SFX 184    0       takotan      .
SFX 184    0       takotarik      .
SFX 184    0       takoz      .
SFX 184    0       takorekin      .
SFX 184    0       takorendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       takorentzat      .
SFX 184    0       takori      .
SFX 184    0       takorik      .
SFX 184    0       takoan      .
SFX 184    0       takoraino      .
SFX 184    0       takorantz      .
SFX 184    0       takorat      .
SFX 184    0       takora      .
SFX 184    0       takotik      .
SFX 184    0       taraino      .
SFX 184    0       tarainoko/243      .
SFX 184    0       tarantz      .
SFX 184    0       tarantzago/243      .
SFX 184    0       tarantzegi      .
SFX 184    0       taranzko/243      .
SFX 184    0       tarat      .
SFX 184    0       tarako/243      .
SFX 184    0       tara      .
SFX 184    0       tarago/243      .
SFX 184    0       tatik      .
SFX 184    0       tatiko/243      .
SFX 184    0       tan      .
SFX 184    0       tarik      .
SFX 184    0       tariko/243      .
SFX 184    0       z      .
SFX 184    0       zko/243      .
SFX 184    0       rekin      .
SFX 184    0       rekiko/243      .
SFX 184    0       rendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       rentzat      .
SFX 184    0       rentzako/243      .
SFX 184    0       ren/238      .
SFX 184    0       rena      .
SFX 184    0       renak      .
SFX 184    0       renarekin      .
SFX 184    0       renarendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       renarentzat      .
SFX 184    0       renari      .
SFX 184    0       renaz      .
SFX 184    0       renei      .
SFX 184    0       renek      .
SFX 184    0       renekin      .
SFX 184    0       renendako/243      .
SFX 184    0       renentzat      .
SFX 184    0       renetaraino      .
SFX 184    0       renetarantz      .
SFX 184    0       renetarat      .
SFX 184    0       renetara      .
SFX 184    0       renetatik      .
SFX 184    0       renetan      .
SFX 184    0       renetarik      .
SFX 184    0       renez      .
SFX 184    0       rengan      .
SFX 184    0       rengana      .
SFX 184    0       renganaino      .
SFX 184    0       renganantz      .
SFX 184    0       rengandik      .
SFX 184    0       rengatik      .
SFX 184    0       renoi      .
SFX 184    0       renok      .
SFX 184    0       renokin      .
SFX 184    0       renontzat      .
SFX 184    0       renotaz      .
SFX 184    0       renoz      .
SFX 184    0       reni      .
SFX 184    0       renik      .
SFX 184    0       renean      .
SFX 184    0       reneraino      .
SFX 184    0       renerantz      .
SFX 184    0       renerat      .
SFX 184    0       renera      .
SFX 184    0       renetik      .
SFX 184    0       ri      .
SFX 184    0       rik      .
